Ohio, session 136, HB641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. The Department of Natural Resources' Division of Parks and Watercraft shall conduct a study to evaluate the creation and expansion of all purpose vehicle and side-by-side riding opportunities across Ohio. The Division may conduct the study in consultation with state universities, local governments, and relevant stakeholders. The Division shall use Shawnee State Park, East Fork State Park, and Salt Fork State Park as primary study sites. The study shall include all of the following: (A) A geographic and environmental assessment to identify terrain types suitable for side-by-side use. The assessment shall include an environmental impact analysis and assess seasonal weather effects and trail durability. (B) An economic and social impact assessment to estimate the potential tourism revenue, local business growth, job creation opportunities, and permit and trail pass revenue potential. Such assessment shall include a cost-benefit comparison of trail construction, operation, and maintenance. (C) A safety and enforcement analysis. The analysis shall establish standards for trail width, visibility, and speed limits. Such analysis also shall evaluate emergency access routes, signage, and communication coverage. The Division shall coordinate with local law enforcement to recommend enforcement protocols. In conducting the analysis, the Division shall review noise, dust, and emissions standards to ensure environmental compliance with all applicable laws. (D) A public use and conflict management assessment. The assessment shall include proposals for zoning or temporal separation of uses and identify designated quiet or wildlife zones adjacent to trail systems. Such assessment also shall recommend seasonal or rotating trail closures to protect sensitive habitats. In conducting the assessment, the Division shall survey trail users for input. (E) An economic development and tourism integration assessment that includes statewide economic modeling of projected tourism and tax impacts. The assessment shall include developments for branding opportunities, assess potential for interstate trail connections and integrated tourism corridors, and evaluate partnerships with local tourism bureaus, chambers of commerce, and private outfitters. (F) An infrastructure and funding assessment to provide cost estimates for trail construction and grading; parking and staging areas; signage, safety, and wayfinding systems; wildlife fencing and protecting features; and visitor education kiosks and interpretive displays. In conducting the assessment, the Division shall explore federal and private funding opportunities, including the U.S. Department of Transportation Federal Highway Administration's Recreational Trails Program and the Appalachian Regional Commission's grants and funding opportunities. Such assessment also shall evaluate the Division's capacity for ongoing maintenance and collaboration with volunteer trail clubs. Section 2. The Department of Natural Resources' Division of Wildlife shall conduct a study to evaluate the feasibility of reintroducing elk into Ohio's state forests and wildlife areas. The Division may conduct the study in consultation with state universities, local governments, and relevant stakeholders. The study shall include all of the following: (A) A habitat suitability assessment to identify candidate zones based on size, vegetation, forage, shelter, and water access. Such assessment shall utilize geographic information system mapping of public and adjacent private lands to evaluate habitat connectivity. The assessment also shall assess human proximity to a proposed habitat and identify natural and man-made migration barriers. (B) An ecological impact assessment to evaluate potential effects on biodiversity, native vegetation, and species interactions. Such assessment shall assess potential soil, forest, and water impacts from elk movement and grazing. The assessment also shall analyze the risk of crop damage and mitigation strategies and determine compatibility with existing wildlife management zones and deer hunting practices. (C) A risk analysis for chronic wasting disease, bovine tuberculosis, and other transmissible diseases. The analysis shall include veterinary health screening and quarantine procedures for any translocated elk. The Division shall coordinate its findings with the Ohio Department of Agriculture and the U.S. Department of Agriculture's Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service. (D) A source population and logistics analysis to identify donor states, analyze transportation methods, mortality risks, and relocation costs, and to evaluate genetic suitability, appropriate transfer seasons, and acclimation procedures. (E) A management and monitoring analysis to model regional carrying capacity and long-term population growth. The analysis shall include proposals for management strategies, including potential limited hunting seasons. Such analysis also shall develop annual monitoring, collar-tracking, and public reporting procedures. (F) A fiscal and economic evaluation to estimate the costs to the state and potential return on investment through license sales, tourism, and related tax revenues. The evaluation also shall include cost estimates for wildlife fencing and protection features and visitor education kiosks and interpretive displays. In determining the cost estimates, the Division shall explore federal and private funding opportunities, such as the Pittman-Robertson Wildlife Restoration Fund. The Division may collaborate with state universities, including The Ohio State University and Shawnee State University, for ecological and tourism impact research. Section 3. (A) In conducting the studies described in Sections 1 and 2 of this act, the Division of Parks and Watercraft and the Division of Wildlife, as applicable, shall require at least one public meeting for the presentation of study goals and collection of feedback. Prior to final submission of each study, the Divisions shall provide for a formal public comment period on the draft report. The Divisions shall solicit written input from all of the following: (1) County commissioners; (2) Farm bureaus; (3) Local tourism boards; (4) All-purpose vehicle associations; (5) Wildlife conservation organizations; and (6) Hunting and angling groups. (B) The Department of Natural Resources shall submit a comprehensive report of the studies described in Sections 1 and 2 of this act to the General Assembly and the Governor not later than December 30, 2028. The report shall, at a minimum, include all of the following: (1) Maps of candidate areas for elk reintroduction and side-by-side trails; (2) Economic and environmental assessments; (3) Cost estimates and funding strategies; (4) Stakeholder feedback summary; and (5) Legislative and rulemaking recommendations. Section 4. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 1 2 3 4 5 A DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 725520 Special Projects $3,000,000 $0 D GRF General Revenue Fund Total $3,000,000 $0 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $3,000,000 $0 SPECIAL PROJECTS Of the forgoing appropriation item 725520, Special Projects, $2,000,000 shall be used to conduct a study to evaluate the creation and expansion of all purpose vehicle and side-by-side riding opportunities across Ohio under section 1 of this act. Of the forgoing appropriation item 725520, Special Projects, $1,000,000 shall be use to conduct a study to evaluate the feasibility of reintroducing elk into Ohio's state forests and wildlife areas under section 2 of this act. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance earmarked for the aforementioned studies remaining in appropriation item 725520, Special Projects, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated for the same purposes in fiscal year 2027. Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 6. This act shall be known as the Trails and Tails Act.